North Dakota, session 69, HB1602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-52-02.15 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
54-52-02.15. Public employees retirement system main plan - Closure to new hires - Multiple
plan membership.
1. Under this section "eligible employee" means a permanent employee who:
a. Meets all the eligibility requirements set by this chapter;
b. Is at least eighteen years of age;
c. Becomes a participating member after December 31, 2024; and
d. Is not eligible to participate in the law enforcement plan, judges' plan, highway patrol
plan, teachers' fund for retirement plan, or alternative retirement program established
under section 15-10-17 for university system employees.
2. Effective January 1, 2025, the public employees retirement system defined benefit main plan
maintained for employees is closed to new eligible employees. However, an employee who
becomes a participating or deferred member under this chapter before January 1, 2025,
remains in the defined benefit retirement plan under this chapter, regardless of being rehired
after December 31, 2024.
3. Except as otherwise provided under this section, effective January 1, 2025, an eligible
employee who begins employment with ana participating employer shall participate in the
defined contribution retirement plan under chapter 54-52.6 as provided under section
54-52.6-02.1.
4. This section does not impact an employee to the extent the employee is a participating
member in one or more of the following enumerated plans: law enforcement plan, judges'
plan, highway patrol plan, teachers' fund for retirement plan, or alternative retirement program
established under section 15-10-17 for university system employees.
a. A participating or deferred member in the defined contribution retirement plan under
chapter 54-52.6 who becomes eligible to participate in a plan enumerated under this
subsection is eligible to participate in the retirement plan enumerated under this
subsection.
b. A participating member of a retirement plan enumerated under this subsection who
becomes an eligible employee is not eligible to participate in the defined benefit
retirement plan under this chapter but instead participates in the defined contribution
retirement plan under chapter 54-52.6. However, this subdivision does not apply to an
individual who before January 1, 2025, is a participating or a deferred member under this

H. B. NO. 1602 - PAGE 2
chapter, as that individual continues to participate in the defined benefit retirement plan
under this chapter.
5. The board shall adopt rules to implement this section.
6. This section may not be construed to require a political subdivision to participate in the defined
contribution retirement plan under chapter 54 - 52.6, even if the political subdivision has
participated or continues to participate in the defined benefit retirement plan under this
chapter. Political subdivision participation in the public employees retirement system, including
the defined contribution retirement plan under chapter 54 - 52.6, is optional .
7. Notwithstanding sections 54 - 52 - 02.1 and 54 - 52 - 04, the board may not assess any fees or
costs against a political subdivision for withdrawing from the defined contribution retirement
plan under chapter 54 - 52.6 .

H. B. NO. 1602 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1602.
House Vote: Yeas 72 Nays 18 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State